Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2993
Court proceeding.

(1) A dissolved limited cooperative association that has published a notice under section 21-2991 or 21-2992 may file an application with the district court where the dissolved limited cooperative association's principal office is located for a determination of the amount and form of security to be provided for payment of claims that are contingent or have not been made known to the dissolved limited cooperative association or that are based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution but that, based on the facts known to the dissolved limited cooperative association, are reasonably estimated to arise after the effective date of dissolution.

(2) Notice of the proceeding shall be given by the dissolved limited cooperative association to each known claimant holding a contingent claim within ten days after the filing of the application of the limited cooperative association.

(3) The court may appoint a receiver to represent all claimants whose identities are unknown in any proceeding brought under this section. The reasonable fees and expenses of such receiver, including all reasonable expert witness fees, shall be paid by the dissolved limited cooperative association.

(4) Provision by the dissolved limited cooperative association for security in the amount and the form ordered by the court under section 21-2992 shall satisfy the dissolved limited cooperative association's obligations with respect to claims that are contingent, have not been made known to the dissolved limited cooperative association, or are based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution, and such claims may not be enforced against a member who received a distribution.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 93.